apertium-tt-ba.ba.lexc
LEXICON PRNLEX-PERS

мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:мин # ; 
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:минең # ; 
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:миңә # ; 
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:мине # ; 
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:миндә # ; 
мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:минән # ; 

һин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:һин # ; 
һин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:һинең # ; 
һин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:һиңә # ; 
һин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:һине # ; 
һин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:һиндә # ; 
һин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:һинән # ; 

ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ул # ; 
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:улың # ; 
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:уға # ; 
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:уны # ; 
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:унда # ; 
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:унан # ; 

беҙ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:беҙ # ; 
беҙ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:беҙҙең # ; 
беҙ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:беҙғә # ; 
беҙ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:беҙҙе # ; 
беҙ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:беҙҙә # ; 
беҙ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:беҙҙән # ; 

һеҙ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:һеҙ # ; 
һеҙ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:һеҙҙең # ; 
һеҙ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:һеҙғә # ; 
һеҙ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:һеҙҙе # ; 
һеҙ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:һеҙҙә # ; 
һеҙ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:һеҙҙән # ; 

улар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:улар # ; 
улар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:уларҙың # ; 
улар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:уларға # ; 
улар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:уларҙы # ; 
улар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:уларҙа # ; 
улар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:уларҙан # ; 

LEXICON PRNDEM-BUL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:л # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:ның # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:ға # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:ны # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:нда # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:нан # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:л%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE ;


LEXICON PRNITGLEX

%<prn%>%<itg%>: POSS ; 

LEXICON PRNDEMLEX

%<prn%>%<dem%>: CASE ; 
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE ; 

LEXICON PRNREFLEX

%<prn%>%<ref%>: POSS ; 

LEXICON DETQNTLEX

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ; 

LEXICON DETINDLEX

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ; 

LEXICON DETDEMLEX

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ; 

LEXICON POSTLEX

%<post%>: # ; 

LEXICON POSTADVLEX

%<postadv%>: # ; 

LEXICON ADVITGLEX

%<adv%>%<itg%>: # ; 

LEXICON ADVLEX

%<adv%>: CLIT ; 

LEXICON CCLEX

%<cnjcoo%>: # ; 

LEXICON CALEX

%<cnjadv%>: # ; 

LEXICON PREDLEX

%<pred%>: CLIT ; 
!%<pred%>: V-NONFINITE-FORMS ; 

LEXICON PREDLEX-I

%<pred%>%<ger5%>:%>кән POSS ;
%<pred%>%<ifi%>:%>не V-PERS-S2 ; 

LEXICON ABBR 

%<abbr%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!



LEXICON Conjunctions

үә:үә CCLEX ; ! ""
һәм:һәм CCLEX ; ! ""  
ә:ә CCLEX ; ! ""
әммә:әммә CCLEX ; ! ""

да:%~да CCLEX ; ! "" Dir/RL
да:да CCLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
да:та CCLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
да:ҙа CCLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
да:ла CCLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
да:дә CCLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
да:тә CCLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
да:ҙә CCLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
да:лә CCLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR


шуға% күрә:шуға% күрә CALEX ; ! ""

LEXICON Postpositions 

менән:менән POSTLEX ; ! ""
инде:инде POSTLEX ; ! ""
өсөн:өсөн POSTLEX ; ! ""
арҡыры:арҡыры POSTLEX ; ! ""
аша:аша POSTLEX ; ! ""
кәрәк:кәрәк POSTLEX ; ! ""
ҡаршы:ҡаршы POSTLEX ; ! ""
башҡа:башҡа POSTLEX ; ! ""
ҡарамаҫтан:ҡарамаҫтан POSTLEX ; ! ""
аҫтында:аҫтында POSTLEX ; ! ""

буйынса:буйынса POSTLEX ; ! ""
кеүек:кеүек POSTLEX ; ! ""
ҡарамағында:ҡарамағында POSTLEX ; ! ""
тапҡыр:тапҡыр POSTLEX ; ! ""
тиклем:тиклем POSTLEX ; ! ""
хаҡында:хаҡында POSTLEX ; ! ""
һайын:һайын POSTLEX ; ! ""
аҫтына:аҫтына POSTLEX ; ! ""
буйлап:буйлап POSTLEX ; ! ""
булараҡ:булараҡ POSTLEX ; ! ""


LEXICON Postadverbs

ғына:%~ғына POSTADVLEX ; ! "" Dir/RL
ғына:ғына POSTADVLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
ғына:генә POSTADVLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
ғына:ҡына POSTADVLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
ғына:кенә POSTADVLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR

LEXICON Pronouns

PRNLEX-PERS ; 

ни:ни PRNITGLEX ; ! ""
нимә:нимә PRNITGLEX ; ! ""
кем:кем PRNITGLEX ; ! ""

был:бы PRNDEM-BUL ; ! ""
шул:шу PRNDEM-BUL ; ! ""
ошо:ошо PRNDEMLEX ; ! ""
теге:теге PRNDEMLEX ; ! ""

үҙ:үҙ PRNREFLEX ; ! ""


LEXICON Determiners 

был:был DETDEMLEX ; ! ""
ошо:ошо DETDEMLEX ; ! ""
шул:шул DETDEMLEX ; ! ""
теге:теге DETDEMLEX ; ! ""

бөтә:бөтә DETQNTLEX ; ! ""
бар:бар DETQNTLEX ; ! ""
барлыҡ:барлыҡ DETQNTLEX ; ! ""

бер:бер DETINDLEX ; ! ""

LEXICON Numerals

бер:бер NUMLEX ; ! ""
ике:ике NUMLEX ; ! ""
өс:өс NUMLEX ; ! ""
дүрт:дүрт NUMLEX ; ! ""
биш:биш NUMLEX ; ! ""
алты:алты NUMLEX ; ! ""
ете:ете  NUMLEX ; ! ""
һигеҙ:һигеҙ NUMLEX ; ! ""
туғыҙ:туғыҙ  NUMLEX ; ! ""
ун:ун NUMLEX ; ! ""

ун% бер:ун% бер NUMLEX ; ! ""
ун% ике:ун% ике NUMLEX ; ! ""
ун% өс:ун% өс NUMLEX ; ! ""
ун% дүрт:ун% дүрт NUMLEX ; ! ""
ун% биш:ун% биш NUMLEX ; ! ""
ун% алты:ун% алты NUMLEX ; ! ""
ун% ете:ун% ете NUMLEX ; ! ""
ун% һигеҙ:ун% һигеҙ NUMLEX ; ! ""
ун% туғыҙ:ун% туғыҙ NUMLEX ; ! ""

егерме:егерме NUMLEX ; ! ""
утыҙ:утыҙ NUMLEX ; ! ""
ҡырҡ:ҡырҡ NUMLEX ; ! ""
илле:илле NUMLEX ; ! ""
алтмыш:алтмыш NUMLEX ; ! ""
етмеш:етмеш NUMLEX ; ! ""
һикһән:һикһән NUMLEX ; ! ""
туҡһан:туҡһан NUMLEX ; ! ""
йөҙ:йөҙ NUMLEX ; ! ""

мең:мең NUMLEX ; ! ""
төмән:төмән NUMLEX ; ! "archaic for 10 000"
миллион:миллион NUMLEX ; ! ""
миллиард:миллиард NUMLEX ; ! ""

LEXICON Abbreviations 

км²:км² ABBR ; 
км³:км³ ABBR ; 
км:км ABBR ; 

LEXICON Punctuation

.%<sent%>:. # ;
..%<sent%>:.. # ;
...%<sent%>:... # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ; 
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
%"%<sent%>:%" # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
\%<sent%>:\ # ;
/%<sent%>:/ # ;

<(%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9)+>  DIGITLEX ; ! Use/Circ

LEXICON Adverbs 
ҡайҙа:ҡайҙа ADVITGLEX ; ! ""
ҡая:ҡая ADVITGLEX ; ! ""
ҡасан:ҡасан ADVITGLEX ; ! ""
нисек:нисек ADVITGLEX ; ! ""
ни% өсөн:ни% өсөн ADVITGLEX ; ! ""
түгел:түгел ADVLEX ; ! ""
хәҙер:хәҙер ADVLEX ; ! ""
кисә:кисә ADVLEX ; ! ""
әлегә:әлегә ADVLEX ; ! ""
әкрен:әкрен ADVLEX ; ! ""
тағын:тағын ADVLEX ; ! ""
бөгөн:бөгөн ADVLEX ; ! ""
әле:әле ADVLEX ; ! ""
иң:иң ADVLEX ; ! ""
бик:бик ADVLEX ; ! ""
тик:тик ADVLEX ; ! ""
аҫҡа:аҫҡа ADVLEX ; ! ""
һәр% ваҡыт:һәр% ваҡыт ADVLEX ; ! ""
тышта:тышта ADVLEX ; ! ""
һуң:һуң ADVLEX ; ! ""
әлбиттә:әлбиттә ADVLEX ; ! ""
алдындағы:алдындағы ADVLEX ; ! ""
һаман:һаман ADVLEX ; ! "" FIXME: Check
айырыуса:айырыуса ADVLEX ; ! ""
артабан:артабан ADVLEX ; ! ""
әйтеүенсә:әйтеүенсә ADVLEX ; ! ""
билдәләүенсә:билдәләүенсә ADVLEX ; ! ""
бихисап:бихисап ADVLEX ; ! ""
бығаса:бығаса ADVLEX ; ! ""
быйыл:быйыл ADVLEX ; ! ""
ваҡытлыса:ваҡытлыса ADVLEX ; ! ""
йәмғеһе:йәмғеһе ADVLEX ; ! ""
йәнә:йәнә ADVLEX ; ! ""
тағы:тағы ADVLEX ; ! ""
тәфсирләп:тәфсирләп ADVLEX ; ! ""
тиерлек:тиерлек ADVLEX ; ! ""
тулыһынса:тулыһынса ADVLEX ; ! ""
фекеренсә:фекеренсә ADVLEX ; ! ""
һөйләүенсә:һөйләүенсә ADVLEX ; ! ""
һүҙҙәренсә:һүҙҙәренсә ADVLEX ; ! ""
ғәҙәттәгесә:ғәҙәттәгесә ADVLEX ; ! ""
аңлатыуҙарынса:аңлатыуҙарынса ADVLEX ; ! ""
әйтелеүенсә:әйтелеүенсә ADVLEX ; ! ""
әйтеүҙәренсә:әйтеүҙәренсә ADVLEX ; ! ""
әйткәндәй:әйткәндәй ADVLEX ; ! ""
бармайынса:бармайынса ADVLEX ; ! ""
башлыса:башлыса ADVLEX ; ! ""
бергәләп:бергәләп ADVLEX ; ! ""
бигерәк:бигерәк ADVLEX ; ! ""
билдәләнеүенсә:билдәләнеүенсә ADVLEX ; ! ""
билдәләүҙәренсә:билдәләүҙәренсә ADVLEX ; ! ""
бөгөндән:бөгөндән ADVLEX ; ! ""
бөтөнләй:бөтөнләй ADVLEX ; ! ""
былтыр:былтыр ADVLEX ; ! ""
LEXICON Verbs 
бар:бар PREDLEX ; ! ""
юҡ:юҡ PREDLEX ; ! ""
и:и PREDLEX-I ; ! ""
